Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4314
(UDTA 14) Defenses in action against trust director.

(UDTA 14) In an action against a trust director for breach of trust, the director may assert the same defenses a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances could assert in an action for breach of trust against the trustee.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 14.